Hawaii statutes.
Chapter 256B

HAWAII ABLE SAVINGS PROGRAM

Section

256B-1 Definitions

256B-2 Hawaii ABLE savings program; establishment

256B-3 Functions and powers of the director of
finance

256B-4 Management contract; terms

256B-5 Hawaii ABLE savings accounts; terms and
conditions

256B-6 Account funds

256B-7 Accounts not guaranteed by the State

256B-8 Hawaii ABLE savings program trust fund

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next